src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s7_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - rista: # 
    rista+V+Inf: rista
    rista+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ristir
    rista+V+Sup: rist
    rista+V+Inf: rista
    rista+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ristir
    rista+V+Sup: rist
